Utah statutes.
26-40-104.   Utah Children's Health Insurance Program Advisory Council.
(1)  There is created a Utah Children's Health Insurance Program Advisory
Council consisting of at least eight and no more than 11 members appointed by
the executive director of the department.  The term of each appointment shall
be three years.  The appointments shall be staggered at one-year intervals to
ensure continuity of the advisory council.
(2)  The advisory council shall meet at least quarterly.
(3)  The membership of the advisory council shall include at least one
representative from each of the following groups:
(a)  child health care providers;
(b)  parents and guardians of children enrolled in the program;
(c)  ethnic populations other than American Indians;
(d)  American Indians;
(e)  the Utah Association of Health Care Providers;
(f)  health and accident and health insurance providers; and
(g)  the general public.
(4)  The advisory council shall advise the department on:
(a)  benefits design;
(b)  eligibility criteria;
(c)  outreach;
(d)  evaluation; and
(e)  special strategies for under-served populations.
(5) (a) (i)  Members who are not government employees may not receive
compensation or benefits for their services, but may receive per diem and
expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties at the
rates established by the Division of Finance under Sections 63A-3-106 and
63A-3-107.
(ii)  Members may decline to receive per diem and expenses for their service.
(b) (i)  State government officer and employee members who do not receive
salary, per diem, or expenses from their agency for their service may receive
per diem and expenses incurred in the performance of their official duties
from the council at the rates established by the Division of Finance under
Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(ii)  State government officer and employee members may decline to receive per
diem and expenses for their service.
